Hawaii, session 2025, GM1144.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. This Act is recomraended by the governor for
immediate passage in accordance with article VII, section 9, of
the Constitution of the State of Hawaii.
SECTION 2. In January 2018, the State awarded a
$140,000,000 contract for a design-build delivery construction
for the Hale Ho‘ola Building project located at Hawaii state
hospital. After the project's acceptance, and a warranty period
of two years, the State encountered various issues, many
stemming from latent defects due to poor design and
construction. Investigations into the root causes are still
ongoing. The department of accounting and general services has
been holding the contractor accountable for these issues, but
with limited success.
A major concern is the occurrence of water leaks in both
the building's exterior and plumbing systems and mold growth.
Immediate action is necessary to address these issues to enable
2025-3038 SB1448 HD2 HMSO

Page 2
S.B. NO.
Hawaii state hospital to deliver quality care to patients who
live in the building year around.
Additionally, the department of health has received
grievances from staff regarding violations of article 21 of
their contract, covering safety and health, and the public
employees' collective bargaining agreement, citing an unsafe
working environment.
Due to insufficient funds to fix these issues, the
department of health is requesting an emergency appropriation to
address mold growth and leaks in the Hale Ho‘ola Building.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to make an
emergency appropriation to the department of health for
construction defect remediation at the Hawaii state hospital.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general
revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $10,660,000 or so
much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2024-2025 to
fund construction defect remediation, including the payment of
legal fees and costs of special deputy attorneys general, at the
Hawaii state hospital; provided that any civil fines accrued
from litigious suits, damages, and settlements awarded shall be
deposited into the general fund.
2025-3038 SB1448 HD2 HMSO

Page 3
S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of
health for the purposes of this Act.
SECTION 4. The appropriation made for the construction
defect remediation authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the
end of the fiscal biennium for which the appropriation is made;
provided that all moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as
of June 30, 2026, shall lapse as of that date.
SECTION 5. In accordance with section 9 of article VII of
the Constitution of the State of Hawaii and sections 37-91 and
37-93, Hawaii Revised Statutes, the legislature has determined
that at the beginning of the regular session of 2025, the
general fund expenditure ceiling for fiscal year 2024-2025 was
exceeded by $8,551,795, or one per cent. The appropriations
contained in Act 1, Session Laws of Hawaii 2025, caused the
general fund expenditure ceiling for fiscal year 2024-2025 to be
further exceeded by an additional $30,334,159. Therefore, the
general fund expenditure ceiling for fiscal year 2024-2025 has
already been exceeded by $38,885,954, or one per cent.
The appropriations contained in this Act will cause the
general fund expenditure ceiling for fiscal year 2024-2025 to be
further exceeded by $10,660,000, or one per cent. This
2025-3038 SB1448 HD2 HMSO

Page 4 S.B. NO.
H.D. 2
declaration takes into account the additional general fund
appropriation authorized for fiscal year 2024-2025 in this Act
only. The reasons for exceeding the general fund expenditure
ceiling are that the appropriation made in this Act is necessary
to serve the public interest and to meet the needs addressed by
this Act.
SECTION 6. With the approval of the governor, the
department of health may delegate to other state agencies the
implementation of projects related to this Act if it is
determined to be advantageous to do so by both the department of
health and the agency to which expending authority is to be
delegated.
SECTION 7. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
■ 202 n 5- n 303 i 8 i i S i B n 144 i 8 i i H i D i 2 i H i M i S i O i 4

S.B. NO 1448
S.D. 2
H.D. 2
APPROVED this 14th day of May ,2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI'I

S.B.No. 1448, S.D. 2, H.D. 2
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai'i, Regular Session of 2025.


SB No. 1448, SD 2, HD 2
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE
STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 8, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Third Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2025.
-------
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives